Alabama, session 2026rs, SB246.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
48 Section 1. Sections 8-42-1, 8-42-2, and 8-42-3, Code of
49 Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
50 "§8-42-1
51 The Legislature finds and declares all of the
52 following:
53 (1) Wholesaling real property occurs when a buyer
54 enters into a contract for purchase and sale of a
55 single-family residential property with the seller, of the
56 property thereby creating the buyer's equitable interest in
Page 2

property thereby creating the buyer's equitable interest in
SB246 INTRODUCED
57 the property,. the The buyer then finds a subsequent purchaser
58 willing to pay a higher price for the property and then
59 assigns its interest to the subsequent purchaser for a fee.
60 (2) Certain unfair service agreements provide grant a
61 real estate company with the right to market, list, or assist
62 in selling a residential property for up to 40 years, binding
63 homeowners and successors in interest through a recorded
64 memorandum and penalizing the homeowner or successor in
65 interest for breach of the agreement.
66 (3) The practices of wholesaling residential real
67 estate, and recording these unfair service agreements, pose a
68 significant risk to Alabama homeowners if left unregulated.
69 (4) The lack of any restrictions enables predatory
70 practices against homeowners, especially those who have lived
71 in a home for a long period of time, leading to financial loss
72 and resulting in confusion for unsuspecting subsequent
73 purchasers.
74 (5) The Legislature concludes the following in the
75 interest of protecting Alabama homeowners and home buyers:
76 a. Disclosure of Buyers engaging in wholesaling should
77 be required to disclose the limited interest, marketing, and
78 assignment of the buyer's equitable interest in the
79 homeowner's property should be required of buyers engaging in
80 wholesaling.
81 b. Unfair service agreements create clouds on the
82 titles of Alabama homes, and burden Alabama homeowners with
83 false promises, are against the public interest, and
84 constitute unreasonable restraints on the alienation of real
Page 3

constitute unreasonable restraints on the alienation of real
SB246 INTRODUCED
85 property.
86 c. Investment-oriented solicitations involving real
87 property present risks comparable to those of securities
88 transactions and warrant disclosure-based regulation.
89 d. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
90 infringe on the private property rights of an individual to
91 acquire real property for his or her own use, ownership, or
92 benefit.
93 e. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
94 require an individual to be licensed in order to acquire real
95 property for his or her own use, ownership, or benefit.
96 "§8-42-2
97 (a) A person may acquire an equitable interest in a
98 single-family residential property as the buyer under a
99 contract for the purchase and sale of the property and then
100 may assign or offer to assign the interest for a fee if the
101 buyer discloses in writing all of the following:
102 (1) To any potential subsequent purchaser or assignee,
103 the The nature of the buyer's equitable interest to any
104 potential purchaser or assignee.
105 (2) To the seller of the property, the The buyer's
106 intent to market its equitable interest to the seller of the
107 property prior to commencing any marketing of the property.
108 (3) To the seller of the property, the The effective
109 date of any assignment of the buyer's interest to a subsequent
110 purchaser of the property to the seller of the property at
111 least three business days prior to the effective date of any
112 assignment.
Page 4

assignment.
SB246 INTRODUCED
113 (b) Written disclosure under subsection (a) shall be
114 required for the intent to market and transfer an equitable
115 interest in residential real property, as limited by
116 subsection (d), whether by assignment, novation, or any other
117 similar method of transferring an interest in real property.
118 (c)(1) A violation of this section is a Class C
119 misdemeanor.
120 (2) In addition to criminal penalties, a person
121 violating this section may be liable to the person to whom
122 disclosure is required in an amount equal to three times the
123 fee or amount received by the buyer pursuant to the assignment
124 subject to civil fines and penalties as determined by the
125 commission pursuant to Section 8-42-1.3.
126 (3) Enforcement of this section shall be governed by
127 Section 8-42-1.2.
128 (d) This section shall only apply to transactions
129 involving single-family residential property and shall not
130 apply to any other property transactions.
131 (e) This section shall not infringe on the right of the
132 parties to otherwise agree by contract.
133 (f) This section shall not apply to predevelopment
134 activity for residential subdivisions, condominiums, or other
135 residential predevelopment activity.
136 (g) This section shall not apply to an individual
137 acquiring real property for his or her own use, ownership, or
138 benefit unless the individual intentionally acquires the real
139 property for the benefit of a pass-through entity subject to
140 this chapter or as a means to circumvent the intent of this
Page 5

this chapter or as a means to circumvent the intent of this
SB246 INTRODUCED
141 chapter."
142 "§8-42-3
143 (a) For purposes of this section the following terms
144 have the following meanings:
145 (1) RECORDING. Presenting a document to a county judge
146 of probate for official placement in the public land records.
147 (2) RESIDENTIAL REAL ESTATE. Real property located in
148 this state which is used primarily for a dwelling and contains
149 one to four dwelling units.
150 (3) SERVICE AGREEMENT. A contract under which a person
151 agrees to provide services in connection with the purchase or
152 sale of residential real estate.
153 (4) SERVICE PROVIDER. An individual or entity that
154 provides services to another party under a service agreement.
155 (5) UNFAIR SERVICE AGREEMENT. A service agreement in
156 which the services subject to the agreement are not performed
157 within one year after the date upon which the agreement
158 commences and provides any of the following:
159 a. Purports to run with the land or to be binding on
160 future owners of interests in the real property.
161 b. Allows for assignment of the right to provide the
162 service without notice and agreement of the owner of
163 residential real estate.
164 c. Purports to create a lien, encumbrance, or other
165 real property security interest.
166 (b)(a) This chapter does not apply to any of the
167 following:
168 (1) A home warranty or other type of similar product
Page 6

(1) A home warranty or other type of similar product
SB246 INTRODUCED
169 that covers the cost of maintenance of for a major housing
170 home system, such as plumbing or electrical wiring, for a set
171 period of time from the date a house is sold.
172 (2) An insurance contract.
173 (3) An option to purchase or right of refusal to
174 purchase real estate.
175 (4) A maintenance or repair agreement entered into by a
176 homeowners' association in a common interest community.
177 (5) Agreements to manage residential real estate.
178 (6) A declaration of any covenants, conditions, or
179 restrictions created in the formation of a homeowners'
180 association, a group of condominium owners, or other common
181 interest community, or an amendment to the declaration.
182 (7) A mortgage loan or commitment to make or receive a
183 mortgage loan.
184 (8) A security agreement under Alabama's Uniform
185 Commercial Code, relating to the sale or rental of personal
186 property or fixtures.
187 (9) Water, sewer, electrical, telephone, cable, or
188 other regulated utility service providers.
189 (c)(b) This section does not impair the rights granted
190 by a mechanic's or materialman's lien under Division 8 of
191 Article 5 of Chapter 11 of Title 35, or by another any other
192 judicially imposed lien.
193 (d)(c) If a service agreement is unfair under this
194 section chapter, it is unenforceable.
195 (e)(d) If a person enters into an unfair service
196 agreement with a consumer, that agreement shall be deemed a
Page 7

agreement with a consumer, that agreement shall be deemed a
SB246 INTRODUCED
197 deceptive act under the Deceptive Trade Practices Act,
198 commencing with Section 8-19-1.
199 (f)(e)(1) No person shall record or cause to be
200 recorded an unfair service agreement, or a notice or
201 memorandum of an unfair service agreement, in the this state.
202 (2) If an unfair service agreement is recorded in this
203 state, it the agreement shall not be deemed to provide actual
204 or constructive notice against an otherwise bona fide
205 purchaser of the residential real property to which it the
206 agreement pertains, or against a creditor with a security
207 interest in the residential real property to which it pertains
208 that property.
209 (3) A service provider who records or causes to be
210 recorded an unfair service agreement, or a notice or
211 memorandum thereof of an unfair service agreement, in this
212 state is liable to an affected party for statutory damages in
213 the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in statutory
214 damages.
215 (g)(f) If an unfair service agreement, or a notice or
216 memorandum of an unfair service agreement, is recorded in the
217 state, any party with an interest in the residential real
218 property to which it the agreement pertains may take either or
219 both of the following actions:
220 (1) Apply to the circuit court in the county where the
221 recording exists is located to seek a court order declaring
222 the agreement is void and of no effect.
223 (2) In addition to the statutory damages described in
224 subdivision (f)(e)(3), recover actual damages, plus costs and
Page 8

subdivision (f)(e)(3), recover actual damages, plus costs and
SB246 INTRODUCED
225 attorney fees as may be proven against the service provider
226 who recorded the agreement."
227 Section 2. Sections 8-42-1.1, 8-42-1.2, 8-42-1.3,
228 8-42-4, and 8-42-5 are added to the Code of Alabama 1975, to
229 read as follows:
230 §8-42-1.1
231 For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have
232 the following meanings:
233 (1) COMMISSION. The Alabama Securities Commission.
234 (2) CONTACT. Any communication delivered by mail,
235 courier, email, text message, social media message, telephone
236 call, voicemail, prerecorded message, or similar method.
237 (3) INVESTMENT-ORIENTED REAL PROPERTY SOLICITATION. Any
238 communication, offer, agreement, or transaction involving real
239 property in which the expected economic benefit to the
240 offeror, directly or indirectly, is derived primarily from
241 resale, assignment, appreciation, fee extraction, or
242 contractual arbitrage, rather than occupancy or personal use
243 by the offeror.
244 (4) OFFEROR. Any person acting directly or indirectly
245 on behalf of another person.
246 (5) RECORDING. Presenting a document to a county judge
247 of probate for official placement in the public land records.
248 (6) RESIDENTIAL REAL ESTATE. Real property located in
249 this state which is used primarily for a dwelling and contains
250 one to four dwelling units.
251 (7) SERVICE AGREEMENT. A contract under which a person
252 agrees to provide services in connection with the purchase or
Page 9

agrees to provide services in connection with the purchase or
SB246 INTRODUCED
253 sale of residential real estate.
254 (8) SERVICE PROVIDER. An individual or entity that
255 provides services to another party under a service agreement.
256 (9) UNFAIR SERVICE AGREEMENT. A service agreement in
257 which the services subject to the agreement are not performed
258 within one year after the date upon which the agreement
259 commences and which provides any of the following:
260 a. Purports to run with the land or to be binding on
261 future owners of interests in the real property.
262 b. Allows for assignment of the right to provide the
263 service without notice to and agreement of the owner of
264 residential real estate.
265 c. Purports to create a lien, encumbrance, or other
266 real property security interest.
267 (10) UNSOLICITED. Initiated without an affirmative
268 request by the property owner within the preceding 12 months
269 and not made pursuant to an existing written agreement with
270 the property owner.
271 §8-42-1.2
272 (a) The commission shall have authority under this
273 chapter to administer, implement, and enforce all regulated
274 conduct, individuals, and entities in this chapter, along with
275 issuing licenses for these activities. This authority extends
276 to regulating investment-oriented real estate solicitations,
277 assignments or offerings of assignments of equitable
278 interests, recorded service agreements, unfair service
279 agreements, unsolicited offers, and related practices. This
280 exclusive authority applies regardless of any license an
Page 10

exclusive authority applies regardless of any license an
SB246 INTRODUCED
281 individual or entity may hold under any other legal provision.
282 (b) The commission may adopt rules necessary to carry
283 out this chapter, including, but not limited to, rules
284 governing:
285 (1) Consumer complaint intake and resolution
286 procedures;
287 (2) Disclosure forms and content;
288 (3) Examination, reporting, and recordkeeping
289 requirements;
290 (4) Any licensing, permitting, or registration program,
291 and fees established, by rule;
292 (5) Any renewal, suspension, or revocation program
293 established, by rule;
294 (6) Penalty schedules and remedial measures;
295 (7) Defining additional unfair, deceptive, or abusive
296 practices; and
297 (8) Definitions and standards necessary to preclude
298 circumvention of this chapter.
299 (c) The commission may:
300 (1) Conduct investigations and examinations;
301 (2) Require the production of documents and testimony;
302 (3) Issue subpoenas;
303 (4) Issue cease and desist orders;
304 (5) Suspend, revoke, or condition any license, permit,
305 or registration established, by rule;
306 (6) Impose administrative fines and penalties for each
307 violation;
308 (7) Order restitution, rescission, disgorgement, or
Page 11

(7) Order restitution, rescission, disgorgement, or
SB246 INTRODUCED
309 other remedial relief;
310 (8) Prosecute criminal violations where authorized by
311 law; and
312 (9) Coordinate with other agencies as authorized by
313 law.
314 (d) The commission may bring an action in any court of
315 appropriate jurisdiction for:
316 (1) Injunctive or other relief;
317 (2) Civil penalties;
318 (3) Restitution, rescission, or disgorgement;
319 (4) Enforcement of administrative orders;
320 (5) Recovery of investigative and enforcement costs;
321 and
322 (6) Appointment of a receiver.
323 (e) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit
324 criminal prosecution under any provision of law or to require
325 exhaustion of administrative remedies before criminal
326 enforcement.
327 (f) Enforcement under this chapter shall be in addition
328 to, not in lieu of, remedies available under the Deceptive
329 Trade Practices Act.
330 (g) Any contractual provision attempting to waive
331 rights, remedies, or protections under this chapter is void
332 and unenforceable as against public policy.
333 (h) The authority granted under this chapter applies to
334 individual violations as well as to patterns or practices of
335 conduct, whether arising under a single section or multiple
336 sections of this chapter.
Page 12

sections of this chapter.
SB246 INTRODUCED
337 (i) The existence or nonexistence of an enforcement
338 action by the commission or other governmental agency pursuant
339 to this section shall not bar, delay or diminish any private
340 right of action.
341 §8-42-1.3
342 (a) The commission may impose administrative fines and
343 penalties per violation. The civil penalty shall not exceed
344 one million dollars ($1,000,000) per violation, provided that
345 the aggregate civil penalty assessed in a single
346 administrative order shall not exceed one hundred million
347 dollars ($100,000,000). Each day an act, omission, or
348 violation continues shall constitute a separate violation.
349 (b) In determining the amount of any civil penalty, the
350 commission shall consider all relevant factors, including:
351 (1) The nature, gravity, and duration of the violation,
352 including any irreparable harm or risk of harm to property
353 owners;
354 (2) The degree of culpability, intent, or recklessness
355 demonstrated by the violator;
356 (3) The facts, circumstances, and conduct in connection
357 with the investment-oriented real estate activity at issue;
358 (4) The economic benefit, compensation, or other
359 financial gain obtained, directly or indirectly, as a result
360 of the violation;
361 (5) Any prior history of violations of this act, the
362 Alabama Securities Act, or related consumer protection laws;
363 and
364 (6) The violator's ability to pay the assessed penalty.
Page 13

(6) The violator's ability to pay the assessed penalty.
SB246 INTRODUCED
365 (c) Civil penalties under this section may be assessed
366 for any violation occurring within five years after the
367 discovery of the fraud.
368 (d) All civil penalties recovered under this section,
369 except for amounts representing the reasonable costs incurred
370 by the commission in the investigation and enforcement of
371 violations, shall be deposited into a consumer recovery fund
372 which shall be administered by the commission. The fund shall
373 be budgeted and allotted in accordance with Article 4 of
374 Chapter 4 of Title 41 and Chapter 19 of Title 41. Money in the
375 fund shall only be used to compensate individuals for economic
376 losses resulting from fraudulent conveyances.
377 §8-42-4
378 (a) This section shall govern every unsolicited
379 electronic, telephonic, or video communication, or written
380 inquiry, solicitation, or mailing by any individual or entity,
381 whether acting as a principal, investor, intermediary, or
382 agent, that makes an investment-oriented real property
383 solicitation and that expresses an interest in any of the
384 following:
385 (1) Buying real property or an option to buy real
386 property from the addressee.
387 (2) Buying the real property to which the written
388 inquiry or mailing is addressed.
389 (3) Offering services relating to the sale of real
390 estate.
391 (b) Any unsolicited communication or solicitation
392 governed by this section that constitutes an
Page 14

governed by this section that constitutes an
SB246 INTRODUCED
393 investment-oriented real property solicitation by any
394 individual or entity that expresses an interest in: (i) buying
395 real property or an option to buy real property from the
396 addressee; (ii) buying the real property to which such written
397 inquiry or mailing is addressed; or (iii) offering services
398 relating to the sale of real estate, shall include the
399 following:
400 (1) At the top and at least two inches from any other
401 text in the written inquiry or mailing, the following notice
402 in capital letters: "THIS IS A SOLICITATION. THE SENDER IS
403 CONTACTING YOU TO INQUIRE ABOUT YOUR INTEREST IN SELLING YOUR
404 HOME OR OTHER REAL ESTATE. YOU ARE NOT OBLIGATED TO RESPOND."
405 (2) If the solicitation includes a monetary offer,
406 after the text required in subdivision (1), the following
407 notice in capital letters: "THIS OFFER MAY OR MAY NOT BE THE
408 FAIR MARKET VALUE OF THE PROPERTY."
409 (3) If the solicitation includes a monetary offer less
410 than the previous year's assessed value for ad valorem taxes
411 set by the county tax assessor for the county where the
412 property is located, following the text required in
413 subdivision (2), the following notice in capital letters:
414 "THIS OFFER IS LESS THAN THE COUNTY ASSESSED VALUE FOR THIS
415 PROPERTY."
416 (4) On the front of the envelope or, if there is no
417 envelope, on the part of the written inquiry or mailing that
418 bears the postage stamp or postage amount, the following
419 notice in capital letters: "SOLICITATION. YOU ARE UNDER NO
420 OBLIGATION TO OPEN OR TO RESPOND."
Page 15

OBLIGATION TO OPEN OR TO RESPOND."
SB246 INTRODUCED
421 (5) On the front of the envelope or, if there is no
422 envelope, on the part of the written inquiry or mailing that
423 bears the postage stamp or postage amount, the following
424 notice in capital letters: "YOU ARE ENCOURAGED TO SEEK
425 GUIDANCE FROM A LICENSED REAL ESTATE AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF YOUR
426 CHOOSING."
427 (6) The notices required in subdivisions (1) and (2)
428 shall be:
429 a. In a font that matches the majority of the text of
430 the written inquiry or mailing;
431 b. At least the size of the text of the written inquiry
432 or mailing, and in any case no smaller than 16-point font; and
433 c. Displayed in a distinctly contrasting color.
434 (c) If an offeror makes an unsolicited offer to buy
435 real property by sending a written agreement or purchase
436 contract via mail or electronic means to an offeree, and the
437 offeror does not use the assistance of a broker or brokerage
438 service, as defined in Chapter 27 of Title 34, or a licensed
439 attorney, as defined in Chapter 3 of Title 34, then the
440 offeree may cancel the agreement or contract by mailing
441 written notice of cancellation to the offeror, postmarked no
442 later than 30 days from the date of the confirmation letter
443 described in this section.
444 (d) An unsolicited offer to buy real property delivered
445 by mail or electronic means is not considered accepted by the
446 offeree until:
447 (1) The offeree signs the agreement or contract;
448 (2) The offeror receives the signed agreement or
Page 16

(2) The offeror receives the signed agreement or
SB246 INTRODUCED
449 contract; and
450 (3) The offeror mails or electronically transmits a
451 confirmation letter to the offeree confirming receipt of the
452 signed agreement or contract, explaining the offeree's right
453 to cancel, describing how to cancel, and stating the
454 cancellation deadline.
455 (e) Cancellation of the agreement or contract by the
456 offeree under this section shall not result in any penalty to
457 the offeree. Any agreement or contract that penalizes an
458 offeree for canceling within the prescribed 30-day period is
459 void. The offeree shall return all payments received from the
460 offeror no later than 30 days after cancellation.
461 (f) A third-party buyer who purchases the real property
462 from the offeror before the offeree's right to cancel expires
463 takes title subject to that right. If the offeree exercises
464 the right to cancel, the title acquired by the third-party
465 buyer becomes void, and title reverts immediately to the
466 offeree. Such reversion shall occur by operation of law, and
467 any conveyance derived from the voided title is likewise void.
468 (g) Violations of this section shall be enforced in
469 accordance with Section 8-42-1.2.
470 (h) This chapter does not apply to properties that are:
471 (i) subject to an active written listing agreement with a
472 licensed real estate broker; (ii) marketed for sale by the
473 property owner or to an individual attempting to acquire an
474 interest in real estate from another person with whom he or
475 she has an existing business or personal relationship; (iii)
476 or where the property interest being acquired is for his or
Page 17

or where the property interest being acquired is for his or
SB246 INTRODUCED
477 her personal use or benefit.
478 §8-42-5
479 (a) This section applies to any individual or entity
480 that makes an investment-oriented real property solicitation
481 that makes an unsolicited written, electronic, or telephonic
482 communication to a property owner for the purpose of doing any
483 of the following:
484 (1) Making an offer to purchase real property;
485 (2) Securing an option to purchase real property; or
486 (3) Soliciting services relating to the sale of real
487 property.
488 (b)(1) No person or entity shall make more than three
489 unsolicited communications to the same property owner
490 regarding the same parcel of real property within any 12-month
491 period.
492 (2) Each of the following constitutes a separate
493 unsolicited communication:
494 a. A written mailing or delivery;
495 b. An electronic message, including email or text
496 message; and
497 c. A telephonic communication, including voicemail.
498 (3) Multiple communications made within a seven-day
499 period shall be considered one communication for purposes of
500 this section.
501 (c)(1) Each unsolicited communication shall include a
502 clear and conspicuous method by which the property owner may
503 opt out of further communications from that person or entity.
504 (2) Upon receipt of an opt-out request, the person or
Page 18

(2) Upon receipt of an opt-out request, the person or
SB246 INTRODUCED
505 entity shall cease all further unsolicited communications
506 regarding the property and honor the opt-out for a minimum of
507 five years.
508 (3) Any unsolicited communication made after receipt of
509 an opt-out request constitutes a separate violation.
510 (d) It shall be a violation of this chapter to:
511 (1) Use multiple affiliated entities or agents to
512 circumvent the requirements of this section;
513 (2) Recharacterize substantially similar offers to
514 circumvent the 12-month limitation; or
515 (3) Engage in harassment, coercion, or repeated
516 communication intended to pressure a property owner.
517 (e)(1) A person subject to this section shall maintain
518 records sufficient to demonstrate compliance, including:
519 a. Dates and methods of communication;
520 b. Identity of the communicating party; and
521 c. Opt-out requests received.
522 (2) Records shall be retained for not less than five
523 years and shall be subject to examination by the Alabama
524 Securities Commission.
525 (f) Violations of this section shall be enforced in
526 accordance with Section 8-42-1.2.
527 (g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
528 prohibit a single, good-faith, unsolicited offer that complies
529 with this chapter or restrict communications initiated by the
530 property owner.
531 Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
532 1, 2026.
Page 19